Washington statutes.
RCW 18.180.035

Fees—Limitations.

(1) A process server required to register under RCW 18.180.010(1) or exempt from registration under *RCW 18.180.010(2) (a), (c), or (d) shall be allowed to charge and collect the following fees in civil actions, suits, and proceedings for each service assignment delivered to the process server for service:

(a) If the fee is not greater than one hundred dollars, then the actual amount charged to a party for service;

(b) If the fee is greater than one hundred dollars, then a reasonable amount charged to a party for service.

(2) Any fees allowable under this section, and actually charged by a process server, shall be a reasonable cost awarded to, and recoverable by, the party incurring same if that party prevails in an action.

[ 2007 c 121 s 2.]

NOTES:

*Reviser's note: RCW 18.180.010 was amended by 2010 c 108 s 1, deleting subsection (2)(d).